Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6039.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4. (1) When If a state committed prisoner who was incarcerated in a state correctional facility has escaped, not returned pursuant to agreement, or violated the terms of his or her the prisoner's parole and has been apprehended pursuant to an order of the department of corrections and is held in a county jail awaiting disposition of his or her the prisoner's case, the department of corrections shall reimburse the county holding the prisoner for the actual and reasonable daily costs , not to exceed $35.00 per day, incurred by the county in holding the prisoner as set by the legislature through the appropriations process. This section shall does not apply to the holding of prisoners awaiting prosecution on new felony charges. (2) Each county shall submit monthly its itemized costs as described in this section to the department of corrections. After determination of reasonableness of the amount to be paid, the department of corrections shall make payment shall be made in accordance with the accounting laws of the this state. The determination of reasonableness by the department of corrections shall be is conclusive.